District of Columbia statutes.
24-931

Post-BOOT CAMP supervision.

The Director shall promulgate rules establishing a program of continuing supervision for BOOT CAMP participants released on conditional release. The program shall be 9 months in length and shall include participation by the eligible juvenile offender’s family members. The program may include follow-up substance abuse treatment, educational assistance such as tutoring, assistance in seeking employment, and, if appropriate, inclusion in the Mayor’s Mentoring and Volunteerism program, created pursuant to Mayor’s Order 92-24 dated March 4, 1992. The program may utilize volunteers.

Jan. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-67, § 502, 40 DCR 5768
1981 Ed., § 24-831.